District of Columbia statutes.
28-4806.01

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among the states that enact it.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 502(c), 48 DCR 2087
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 601 of the Uniform Principal and Income Act (1997 Act).